Massachusetts, session 194th, H4585.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding clause 41C of section 5 of chapter 59 or any other general 
or special law to the contrary, with respect to real property in the Town of Auburn the following 
factors determining exemption for real property under clause 41C of section 5 of chapter 59 shall 
be adjusted as follows: 
(1) increasing the sum of $500 contained in the first sentence of clause 41C to $1,500; (2) 
adding the following at the end of the seventh sentence "or for a person who has reached his 
seventieth birthday prior to the fiscal year for which an exemption is sought who owns the same 
jointly or as a tenant in common with their child who is under the age of seventy and occupied 
by him as his domicile;"; (3) increasing the amounts contained in subclause (B) of said first 
sentence whenever they appear in said subclause from $13,000 dollars and from $15,000 dollars 
to fifty percent of Area Median Income as adjusted for household size, as is published annually 
by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development, as required by Section 8 of the 

of 2 13 Federal Housing Act of 1937 (42 USC Section 1437t), as amended, and the relevant year of the 
calculation shall be the most recent figure available as of July 1 of the start of the fiscal year to 
which the exemption is sought; and (4) increasing the amounts contained in subclause (C) of said 
first sentence whenever they appear in said subclause from $28,000 dollars to not more than 
$80,000 and from $30,000 to not more than $110,000. These adjustments shall not be further 
modified by the second sentence of clause 41C of section 5 of chapter 59. 
SECTION 2. The provisions of this act are severable and if any provision, or portion 
thereof, should be held to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid by any court of competent 
jurisdiction, such unconstitutionality or invalidity shall not affect the remaining provisions, 
which remain in full force and effect. 
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.